Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1524
Accumulation of junk; investigation; removal; notice.

The department of health of a city, or the director, as the case may be, shall have the power to investigate all complaints of violations of section 81-1523 and, if either the department or director finds that the property owner or person in lawful possession of the property has allowed an unlawful accumulation of junk, shall give notice to the owner or person in lawful possession of the property by certified or registered mail to remove the accumulation within thirty days.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 24.